test/src/morphology/N-tshuurtsha_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tšūrtša: # Noun 52 'eng /est piiritaja/fin' - full paradigm
     tšūrtša+N+Sg+Nom: tšūrtša
     tšūrtša+N+Sg+Gen: tšūrtša
     tšūrtša+N+Sg+Par: tšurtšõ
     tšūrtša+N+Sg+Dat: tšūrtšan
     tšūrtša+N+Sg+Ins: tšūrtšaks
     tšūrtša+N+Sg+Ill: tšurtšõ
     tšūrtša+N+Sg+Ela: tšūrtšast
     tšūrtša+N+Pl+Nom: tšūrtšad
     tšūrtša+N+Pl+Gen: tšūrtšad
     tšūrtša+N+Pl+Par: tšūrtšidi
     tšūrtša+N+Pl+Dat: tšūrtšadõn
     tšūrtša+N+Pl+Ins: tšūrtšadõks
     tšūrtša+N+Pl+Ill: tšūrtšiz
     tšūrtša+N+Pl+Ela: tšūrtšist
